Maryland, session 2025, HB0260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–619.
(c) (1) Unless authorized under this title, a person may not use or possess with
intent to use drug paraphernalia to:
(i) plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture,
compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal a
controlled dangerous substance; or
(ii) inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body
a controlled dangerous substance.
– 1 –

Ch. 180 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to:
(i) for a first violation, a fine not exceeding $500; and
(ii) for each subsequent violation, imprisonment not exceeding
[2 years] 1 YEAR or a fine not exceeding [$2,000] $1,000 or both.
(3) A person who is convicted of violating this subsection for the first time
and who previously has been convicted of violating subsection (d)(4) of this section is subject
to the penalty specified under paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) (1) Unless authorized under this title, a person may not deliver or sell, or
manufacture or possess with intent to deliver or sell, drug paraphernalia, knowing, or
under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the drug paraphernalia will
be used to:
(i) plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture,
compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal a
controlled dangerous substance; or
(ii) inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body
a controlled dangerous substance.
(2) A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to:
(i) for a first violation, a fine not exceeding $500; and
(ii) for each subsequent violation, imprisonment not exceeding
[2 years] 1 YEAR or a fine not exceeding [$2,000] $1,000 or both.
(3) A person who is convicted of violating this subsection for the first time
and who previously has been convicted of violating paragraph (4) of this subsection is
subject to imprisonment not exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $2,000 or both.
(4) If a person who is at least 18 years old violates paragraph (1) of this
subsection by delivering drug paraphernalia to a minor who is at least 3 years younger than
the person, the person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to
imprisonment not exceeding 8 years or a fine not exceeding $15,000 or both.
5–620.
(a) Unless authorized under this title, a person may not:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 180
(1) obtain or attempt to obtain controlled paraphernalia by:
(i) fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge;
(ii) counterfeiting a prescription or a written order;
(iii) concealing a material fact or the use of a false name or address;
(iv) falsely assuming the title of or representing to be a
manufacturer, distributor, or authorized provider; or
(v) making or issuing a false or counterfeit prescription or written
order; or
(2) [possess or] distribute controlled paraphernalia under circumstances
which reasonably indicate an intention to use the controlled paraphernalia for purposes of
illegally administering a controlled dangerous substance.
(b) Evidence of circumstances that reasonably indicate an intent to use controlled
paraphernalia to manufacture, [administer,] distribute, or dispense a controlled dangerous
substance unlawfully include the close proximity of the controlled paraphernalia to an
adulterant, diluent, or equipment commonly used to illegally manufacture, [administer,]
distribute, or dispense controlled dangerous substances, including:
(1) a scale;
(2) a sieve;
(3) a strainer;
(4) a measuring spoon;
(5) staples;
(6) a stapler;
(7) a glassine envelope;
(8) a gelatin capsule;
(9) procaine hydrochloride;
(10) mannitol;
(11) lactose;
– 3 –

Ch. 180 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(12) quinine; and
(13) a controlled dangerous substance.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500; AND
(2) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, imprisonment not exceeding
[4 years] 1 YEAR or a fine not exceeding [$25,000] $1,000 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –